Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.585

Dismissal of municipal employees during World War II—Redress not mandatory.

RCW 41.04.580 through 41.04.595 do not require a municipality to adopt an ordinance or resolution providing for redress of salary and other employment related losses.

[ 1986 c 225 s 3.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—1986 c 225: See notes following RCW 41.04.580.